Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.060

Rights inhere to heirs, devisees and assigns.

The heirs, devisees and assigns of the person having such title and possession shall have the same benefit of RCW 7.28.050 as the person from whom the possession is derived.

[ 1893 c 11 s 2; RRS s 787.]